California, session 20252026, AB758.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 4138) is added to Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code, to read: Article 3.5. Public Land Vegetation Management Force State and Local Government to Be Firewise Neighbors Act4138. For purposes of this article, the following terms shall apply: (a) “Fire break” means a gap in vegetation or other combustible material that acts as a barrier to slow or stop brush fire or wildfire. (b) “Local entity” means a city, county, city or county, or other local jurisdiction with fire prevention and suppression authority.(c) “Public land” means undeveloped land under the control of the department or a local entity.(d) “Severe fire hazard” means land designated as a moderate, high, or very high fire hazard severity zone as identified by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to Section 4202 of this code and Section 51178 of the Government Code or as identified by a local agency pursuant to Section 51179 of the Government Code.4138.5. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Force State and Local Government to Be Firewise Neighbors Act.4139. (a) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, and every two years thereafter, the department or a local entity shall conduct an assessment on all public lands for which they are it is primarily responsible for preventing and suppressing fires pursuant Sections 4102 and 4125 to ensure that the public land is not a severe fire hazard.(2) The assessment shall include all of the following:(A) Information on the vegetation management plan, including, but not limited to, what and how often vegetation management is currently being done.(B) Information on the cost of vegetation management described in subparagraph (A).(b) The department and the local entity shall post the assessment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) on its respective internet website. If a local entity prepares the assessment, the local entity shall also submit its assessment to the department.4139.5. (a) When the state or a local government acquires private land undeveloped land, the department or a local entity that is primarily responsible for preventing and suppressing fires pursuant to Section 4125 shall, within one year of acquisition, do both of the following:(1) Create a plan on how the land will be managed with regard to fire prevention.(2) Report the cost of keeping the land managed.(b) The department or the local entity shall post the information pursuant to subdivision (a) on its respective internet website. If a local entity prepares the information, the local entity shall also submit this information to the department.4140. All On or before January 1, 2028, all public lands shall have a 200 foot firebreak on all borders with privately owned land. SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.